Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5375XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5375XD (1) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. NEW SECTION. 11.15 Efficient use of public funds
—— reports.
The auditor of state shall annually update a list of
best practices for maximizing the efficient use of public
funds with innovative, practical, and common sense items
that do not require legislative action. The auditor of
state shall distribute these recommendations to all public
entities and request that the public entities report on which
recommendations are being followed. The auditor of state shall
prepare an annual report that includes and analyzes the reports
received from public entities.